Nebraska, session 109, LB1251.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1251 LB1251
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 52-2001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
52-2001 (1) A homeowners' association has a lien on a member's real
estate for any assessment levied against real estate from the time the
assessment becomes due and a notice containing the dollar amount of such
lien is recorded in the office where mortgages or deeds of trust are
recorded. The homeowners' association's lien may be foreclosed in like
manner as a mortgage on real estate but the homeowners' association shall
give reasonable notice of its action to all lienholders of real estate
whose interest would be affected. Unless the homeowners' association
declaration or agreement otherwise provides, fees, expenses, charges,
attorney's fees, court costs, late charges, and interest charged are
enforceable as assessments under this section. If an assessment is
payable in installments, the full amount of the assessment may be a lien
from the time the first installment thereof becomes due.
(2) A lien under this section is prior to all other liens and
encumbrances on real estate except (a) liens and encumbrances recorded
before the recordation of the declaration or agreement, (b) a first
mortgage or deed of trust on real estate recorded before the notice
required under subsection (1) of this section has been recorded for a
delinquent assessment for which enforcement is sought, and (c) liens for
real estate taxes and other governmental assessments or charges against
real estate. The lien under this section is not subject to the homestead
exemption pursuant to section 40-101.
(3) Unless the declaration or agreement otherwise provides, if two
or more homeowners' associations have liens for assessments created at
any time on the same real estate, those liens have equal priority.
(4) A lien for unpaid assessments is extinguished unless proceedings
to enforce the lien are instituted within five three years after the full
amount of the assessments becomes due. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a
lien for unpaid assessments may be continued for up to five years by the
-2-

LB1251 LB1251
2026 2026
homeowners' association filing a continuation statement in the office
where mortgages or deeds of trust are recorded. To be effective, such
continuation statement must be sent by the homeowners' association to the
member's real estate prior to the original extinguishment date.
(5) This section does not prohibit actions to recover sums for which
subsection (1) of this section creates a lien or prohibit a homeowners'
association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.
(6) A judgment or decree in any action brought under this section
must include costs, to include late fees and interest, and reasonable
attorney's fees for the prevailing party. When awarding such costs and
attorney's fees, the court shall only consider the time and labor
required and the costs and attorney's fees actually incurred by the
prevailing party. The prevailing party's costs and attorney's fees are
recoverable upon a voluntary payment to the prevailing party after the
action is filed but before judgment, or upon a judgment in favor of the
prevailing party.
(7) The homeowners' association, upon written request, shall furnish
to a homeowners' association member a recordable statement setting forth
the amount of unpaid assessments against his or her real estate. The
statement must be furnished within ten business days after receipt of the
request and is binding on the homeowners' association, the governing
board, and every homeowners' association member.
(8) The homeowners' association declaration, agreements, bylaws,
rules, or regulations may not provide that a lien on a member's real
estate for any assessment levied against real estate relates back to the
date of filing of the declaration or that such lien takes priority over
any mortgage or deed of trust on real estate recorded subsequent to the
filing of the declaration and prior to the recording by the association
of the notice required under subsection (1) of this section.
(9) In the event of a conflict between the provisions of the
declaration and the bylaws, rules, or regulations or any other agreement
-3-

LB1251 LB1251
2026 2026
of the homeowners' association, the declaration prevails except to the
extent the declaration is inconsistent with this section.
(10)(a) The homeowners' association may require a person who
purchases restricted real estate on or after September 6, 2013, to make
payments into an escrow account established by the homeowners'
association until the balance in the escrow account for that restricted
real estate is in an amount not to exceed six months of assessments.
(b) All payments made under this subsection and received on or after
September 6, 2013, shall be held in an interest-bearing checking account
in a bank, savings bank, building and loan association, or savings and
loan association in this state under terms that place these payments
beyond the claim of creditors of the homeowners' association. Upon
request by an owner of restricted real estate, the homeowners'
association shall disclose the name of the financial institution and the
account number where the payments made under this subsection are being
held. The homeowners' association may maintain a single escrow account to
hold payments made under this subsection from all of the owners of
restricted real estate. If a single escrow account is maintained, the
homeowners' association shall maintain separate accounting records for
each owner of restricted real estate.
(c) The payments made under this subsection may be used by the
homeowners' association to satisfy any assessments attributable to an
owner of restricted real estate for which assessment payments are
delinquent. To the extent that the escrow deposit or any part thereof is
applied to offset any unpaid assessments of an owner of restricted real
estate, the homeowners' association may require such owner to replenish
the escrow deposit.
(d) The homeowners' association shall return the payments made under
this subsection, together with any interest earned on such payments, to
the owner of restricted real estate when the owner sells the restricted
real estate and has fully paid all assessments.
-4-

LB1251 LB1251
2026 2026
(e) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the homeowners'
association from establishing escrow deposit requirements in excess of
the amounts authorized in this subsection pursuant to provisions in the
homeowners' association's declaration.
(11) For purposes of this section:
(a) Declaration means any instruments, however denominated, that
create the homeowners' association and any amendments to those
instruments;
(b)(i) Homeowners' association means an association whose members
consist of a private group of fee simple owners of residential real
estate formed for the purpose of imposing and receiving payments, fees,
or other charges for:
(A) The use, rental, operation, or maintenance of common elements
available to all members and services provided to the member for the
benefit of the member or his or her real estate;
(B) Late payments of assessments and, after notice and opportunity
to be heard, the levying of fines for violations of homeowners'
association declarations, agreements, bylaws, or rules and regulations;
or
(C) The preparation and recordation of amendments to declarations,
agreements, resale statements, or statements for unpaid assessments; and
(ii) Homeowners' association does not include a co-owners
association organized under the Condominium Property Act or a unit owners
association organized under the Nebraska Condominium Act; and
(c) Real estate means the real estate of a homeowners' association
member as such real estate is specifically described in the member's
homeowners' association declaration or agreement.
Sec. 2. Section 76-874, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-874 (a) The association has a lien on a unit for any assessment
levied against that unit from the time the assessment becomes due and a
-5-

LB1251 LB1251
2026 2026
notice containing the dollar amount of such lien is recorded in the
office where mortgages are recorded. The association's lien may be
foreclosed in like manner as a mortgage on real estate but the
association shall give reasonable notice of its action to all lienholders
of the unit whose interest would be affected. Unless the declaration
otherwise provides, fees, charges, late charges, and interest charged
pursuant to subdivisions (a)(10), (a)(11), and (a)(12) of section 76-860
and expenses, attorney's fees, and court costs are enforceable as
assessments under this section. If an assessment is payable in
installments, the full amount of the assessment may be a lien from the
time the first installment thereof becomes due.
(b) A lien under this section is prior to all other liens and
encumbrances on a unit except (i) liens and encumbrances recorded before
the recordation of the declaration, (ii) a first mortgage or deed of
trust on the unit recorded before the notice required under subsection
(a) of this section has been recorded for a delinquent assessment for
which enforcement is sought, and (iii) liens for real estate taxes and
other governmental assessments or charges against the unit. The lien
under this section is not subject to the homestead exemption pursuant to
section 40-101.
(c) Unless the declaration otherwise provides, if two or more
associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same
real estate, those liens have equal priority.
(d) A lien for unpaid assessments is extinguished unless proceedings
to enforce the lien are instituted within five three years after the full
amount of the assessments becomes due. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a
lien for unpaid assessments may be continued for up to five years by the
association filing a continuation statement in the office where mortgages
are recorded. To be effective, such continuation statement must be sent
by the association to the applicable unit prior to the original
extinguishment date.
-6-

LB1251 LB1251
2026 2026
(e) This section does not prohibit actions to recover sums for which
subsection (a) of this section creates a lien or prohibit an association
from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.
(f) A judgment or decree in any action brought under this section
must include costs, to include late fees and interest, and reasonable
attorney's fees for the prevailing party. When awarding such costs and
attorney's fees, the court shall only consider the time and labor
required and the costs and attorney's fees actually incurred by the
prevailing party. The prevailing party's costs and attorney's fees are
recoverable upon a voluntary payment to the prevailing party after the
action is filed but before judgment, or upon a judgment in favor of the
prevailing party.
(g) The association upon written request shall furnish to a unit
owner a recordable statement setting forth the amount of unpaid
assessments against his or her unit. The statement must be furnished
within ten business days after receipt of the request and is binding on
the association, the executive board, and every unit owner.
Sec. 3. Original sections 52-2001 and 76-874, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-7-